src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NA_C_zhiishiib_gt-norm.yaml
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: ozhiishiibensiwaabaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: ozhiishiibensiwaadigan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: ozhiishiibensiwaadiging
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: ozhiishiibensiwaadigag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nizhiishiibimishinaaniban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nizhiishiibimishinaanidig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gizhiishiibimishinaaniban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gizhiishiibimishinaanidig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: gizhiishiibimishiwaaban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gizhiishiibimishiwaadig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt: ozhiishiibimishiniiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: ozhiishiibimishiniidig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: ozhiishiibimishiwaaban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: ozhiishiibimishiwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nizhiishiibimishinaanin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nizhiishiibimishinaaning
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nizhiishiibimishinaanig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gizhiishiibimishinaanin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gizhiishiibimishinaaning
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gizhiishiibimishinaanig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+4: gizhiishiibimishiwaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: gizhiishiibimishiwaang
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: gizhiishiibimishiwaag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+4: ozhiishiibimishiniwa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+Loc: ozhiishiibimishiniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+Pl: ozhiishiibimishiniwa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+4: ozhiishiibimishiwaan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: ozhiishiibimishiwaang
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: ozhiishiibimishiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: nizhiishiibimishibaniin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nizhiishiibimishibaniing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nizhiishiibimishibaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: gizhiishiibimishibaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gizhiishiibimishibaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gizhiishiibimishibaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: ozhiishiibimishibaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: ozhiishiibimishibaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: ozhiishiibimishibaniig
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: izhiishiibimishibaniin
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: izhiishiibimishibaniing
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: izhiishiibimishibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nizhiishiibiminaanibaniin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nizhiishiibiminaanibaniing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nizhiishiibiminaanibaniig
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nizhiishiibiminaanidigan
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nizhiishiibiminaanidiging
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nizhiishiibiminaanidigag
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gizhiishiibiminaanibaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gizhiishiibiminaanibaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gizhiishiibiminaanibaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gizhiishiibiminaanidigan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gizhiishiibiminaanidiging
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gizhiishiibiminaanidigag
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+4: gizhiishiibimiwaabaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gizhiishiibimiwaabaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gizhiishiibimiwaabaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gizhiishiibimiwaadigan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gizhiishiibimiwaadiging
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gizhiishiibimiwaadigag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+4+Prt+4: ozhiishiibiminiibaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+4+Prt+Loc: ozhiishiibiminiibaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+4+Prt+Pl: ozhiishiibiminiibaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: ozhiishiibiminiidigan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: ozhiishiibiminiidiging
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: ozhiishiibiminiidigag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+4: ozhiishiibimiwaabaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: ozhiishiibimiwaabaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: ozhiishiibimiwaabaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: ozhiishiibimiwaadigan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: ozhiishiibimiwaadiging
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: ozhiishiibimiwaadigag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nizhiishiibishinaanibaniin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nizhiishiibishinaanibaniing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nizhiishiibishinaanibaniig
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nizhiishiibishinaanidigan
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nizhiishiibishinaanidiging
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nizhiishiibishinaanidigag
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gizhiishiibishinaanibaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gizhiishiibishinaanibaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gizhiishiibishinaanibaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gizhiishiibishinaanidigan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gizhiishiibishinaanidiging
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gizhiishiibishinaanidigag
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: gizhiishiibishiwaabaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gizhiishiibishiwaabaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gizhiishiibishiwaabaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gizhiishiibishiwaadigan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gizhiishiibishiwaadiging
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gizhiishiibishiwaadigag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: ozhiishiibishiniibaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: ozhiishiibishiniibaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: ozhiishiibishiniibaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: ozhiishiibishiniidigan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: ozhiishiibishiniidiging
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: ozhiishiibishiniidigag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: ozhiishiibishiwaabaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: ozhiishiibishiwaabaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: ozhiishiibishiwaabaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: ozhiishiibishiwaadigan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: ozhiishiibishiwaadiging
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: ozhiishiibishiwaadigag
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nizhiishiibenyimishinaaniban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nizhiishiibenyimishinaanidig
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nizhiishiibensimishinaaniban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nizhiishiibensimishinaanidig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gizhiishiibenyimishinaaniban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gizhiishiibenyimishinaanidig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: gizhiishiibenyimishiwaaban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gizhiishiibenyimishiwaadig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gizhiishiibensimishinaaniban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gizhiishiibensimishinaanidig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: gizhiishiibensimishiwaaban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gizhiishiibensimishiwaadig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt: ozhiishiibenyimishiniiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: ozhiishiibenyimishiniidig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: ozhiishiibenyimishiwaaban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: ozhiishiibenyimishiwaadig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt: ozhiishiibensimishiniiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: ozhiishiibensimishiniidig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: ozhiishiibensimishiwaaban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: ozhiishiibensimishiwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nizhiishiibenyimishinaanin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nizhiishiibenyimishinaaning
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nizhiishiibenyimishinaanig
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nizhiishiibensimishinaanin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nizhiishiibensimishinaaning
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nizhiishiibensimishinaanig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gizhiishiibenyimishinaanin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gizhiishiibenyimishinaaning
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gizhiishiibenyimishinaanig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+4: gizhiishiibenyimishiwaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: gizhiishiibenyimishiwaang
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: gizhiishiibenyimishiwaag
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gizhiishiibensimishinaanin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gizhiishiibensimishinaaning
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gizhiishiibensimishinaanig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+4: gizhiishiibensimishiwaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: gizhiishiibensimishiwaang
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: gizhiishiibensimishiwaag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+4: ozhiishiibenyimishiniwa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Loc: ozhiishiibenyimishiniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Pl: ozhiishiibenyimishiniwa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+4: ozhiishiibenyimishiwaan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: ozhiishiibenyimishiwaang
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: ozhiishiibenyimishiwaag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+4: ozhiishiibensimishiniwa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Loc: ozhiishiibensimishiniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Pl: ozhiishiibensimishiniwa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+4: ozhiishiibensimishiwaan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: ozhiishiibensimishiwaang
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: ozhiishiibensimishiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: nizhiishiibenyimishibaniin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nizhiishiibenyimishibaniing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nizhiishiibenyimishibaniig
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: nizhiishiibensimishibaniin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nizhiishiibensimishibaniing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nizhiishiibensimishibaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: gizhiishiibenyimishibaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gizhiishiibenyimishibaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gizhiishiibenyimishibaniig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: gizhiishiibensimishibaniin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gizhiishiibensimishibaniing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gizhiishiibensimishibaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: ozhiishiibenyimishibaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: ozhiishiibenyimishibaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: ozhiishiibenyimishibaniig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: ozhiishiibensimishibaniin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: ozhiishiibensimishibaniing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: ozhiishiibensimishibaniig
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: izhiishiibenyimishibaniin
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: izhiishiibenyimishibaniing
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: izhiishiibenyimishibaniig
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt+4: izhiishiibensimishibaniin
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt+Loc: izhiishiibensimishibaniing
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt+Pl: izhiishiibensimishibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nizhiishiibenyiminaanibaniin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nizhiishiibenyiminaanibaniing
